Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1301
Terms, defined.

For the purposes of sections 8-1302 and 8-1303, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Fiduciary shall mean a trustee under any trust, expressed, implied, resulting, or constructive, personal representative, administrator, guardian, committee, conservator, curator, tutor, custodian, nominee, receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, assignee for the benefit of creditors, partner, member, agent, officer of any corporation, public or private, public officer, or any other person acting in a fiduciary capacity for any person, trust, or estate; and

(2) Person shall mean any individual, corporation, government or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, two or more persons having a joint or common interest, or other legal or commercial entity.

Laws 1977, LB 500, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 909, § 12;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 101.